test/src/morphology/mdf-tests-noun_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ава: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ава
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: авань
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: авань
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: авада
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Indef: авада
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Indef: аванди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Indef: аванди
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: авафтома
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: авафтома
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Indef: авашка
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Indef: авашка
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Indef: аваса
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Indef: аваса
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Indef: аваста
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Indef: аваста
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: авас
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: авас
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Indef: авава
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Indef: авава
    ава+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: авакс
    ава+N+Pl+Tra+Indef: авакс
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Sg: авазе
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg: аване
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Sg: авазень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Sg: аванень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px1Sg: [авазенди, авазти]
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px1Sg: аваненди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Sg: авадон
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Sg: авадон
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Sg: авафтомон
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Sg: авафтомон
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Sg: авашкан
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Sg: авашкан
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg: авасон
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg: авасон
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg: авастон
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg: авастон
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Sg: авазон
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Sg: авазон
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg: ававан
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg: ававан
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Sg: аваце
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Sg: аватне
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg: авацень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg: аватнень
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Sg: авадот
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Sg: авадот
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg: авафтомот
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg: авафтомот
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Sg: авашкат
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Sg: авашкат
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Sg: авасот
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Sg: авасот
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Sg: авастот
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Sg: авастот
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Sg: авазт
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Sg: авазт
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Sg: авават
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Sg: авават
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg: авац
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg: аванза
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg: аванц
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg: аванзон
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Sg: авадонза
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Sg: авадонза
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px3Sg: аванцты
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px3Sg: аванзонды
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg: авафтомонза
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg: авафтомонза
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg: авашканза
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg: авашканза
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg: авасонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg: авасонза
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg: авастонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg: авастонза
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Sg: авазонза
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Sg: авазонза
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Sg: ававанза
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Sg: ававанза
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Pl: аваньке
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Pl: аваньке
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Pl: аванькень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Pl: аванькень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px1Pl: аванькенди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px1Pl: аванькенди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Pl: авадонк
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Pl: авадонк
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Pl: авафтомонк
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl: авафтомонк
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl: авашканк
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl: авашканк
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl: авасонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl: авасонк
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl: авастонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl: авастонк
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Pl: авазонк
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Pl: авазонк
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl: ававанк
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl: ававанк
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Pl: аванте
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Pl: аванте
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Pl: авантень
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Pl: авантень
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px2Pl: авантенди
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px2Pl: авантенди
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Pl: авадонт
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Pl: авадонт
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Pl: авафтомонт
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Pl: авафтомонт
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl: авашкант
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl: авашкант
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl: авасонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl: авасонт
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Pl: авастонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Pl: авастонт
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Pl: авазонт
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Pl: авазонт
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Pl: ававант
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Pl: ававант
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Pl: авасна
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Pl: авасна
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl: аваснон
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl: аваснон
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px3Pl: аваснонды
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px3Pl: аваснонды
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Pl: авадост
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Pl: авадост
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl: авафтомост
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl: авафтомост
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl: авашкаст
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl: авашкаст
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl: авасост
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl: авасост
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl: авастост
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Pl: авастост
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Pl: авазост
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Pl: авазост
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Pl: ававаст
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Pl: ававаст
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ават
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg: аване
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg: аванза
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def: авась
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def: авать
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def: авати
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def: аватне
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def: аватнень
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def: аватненди
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: ававок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авадавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авадавок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авандивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авандивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомавок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкавок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваставок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваставок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авасвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авававок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: авававок
    ава+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваксвок
    ава+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аваксвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аваневок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аваненьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: [авазендивок, авазтивок]
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авацевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аватневок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аваценьвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аватненьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкатвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкатвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастотвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастотвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававатвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававатвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авацвок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванцвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванцтывок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзондывок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанзавок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькевок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькеньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькендивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аванькендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканквок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашканквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонквок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонквок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанквок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававанквок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантевок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантевок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантеньвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантеньвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантендивок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авантендивок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкантвок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкантвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонтвок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазонтвок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававантвок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px2Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававантвок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснавок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснавок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснонвок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснонвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснондывок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: аваснондывок
    ава+N+Sg+Abl+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Abl+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авадоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Abe+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Abe+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авафтомоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авашкаствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авасоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авастоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Ill+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазоствок
    ава+N+Pl+Ill+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: авазоствок
    ава+N+Sg+Prl+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Prl+Px3Pl+Clt/вок+Clt: ававаствок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/вок+Clt: аватвок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px1Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аваневок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Px3Sg+Clt/вок+Clt: аванзавок
    ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: авасьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватьвок
    ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: авативок
    ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватневок
    ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватненьвок
    ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/вок+Clt: аватнендивок
